Washington statutes.
RCW 19.240.030

Expiration date allowed, when.

(1) It is lawful to issue, and to enforce against the bearer, a gift certificate containing an expiration date if:

(a) The gift certificate is issued pursuant to an awards or loyalty program for the gift certificate.

(b) The gift certificate is donated to a charitable organization without any money or other thing of value being given in exchange for the gift certificate if the gift certificate is used by a charitable organization solely to provide charitable services.

(2) The expiration date must be disclosed clearly and legibly on any gift certificate described in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2019 c 376 s 3; 2004 c 168 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 376: See note following RCW 19.240.020.